Maryland, session 2025, SB0560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–4302.
There is a Maryland Commission on Health Equity.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0560*

SENATE BILL 560
13–4303.
(a) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) One member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) The Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) The Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) The Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) THE COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTION, OR THE COMMISSIONER’S
DESIGNEE;
[(6)] (7) The Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(7)] (8) The State Superintendent of Schools, or the State
Superintendent’s designee;
(9) THE SECRETARY OF THE ENVIRONMENT, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
[(8)] (10) The Secretary of Housing and Community Development, or the
Secretary’s designee;
[(9)] (11) The Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
[(10)] (12) The Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
(13) THE SECRETARY OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
[(11)] (14) The Deputy Secretary for Behavioral Health, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee;
[(12)] (15) The Deputy Secretary for Public Health Services, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee;
[(13)] (16) The Deputy Secretary for Health Care Financing, or the Deputy
Secretary’s designee;

SENATE BILL 560 3
[(14)] (17) The Maryland Insurance Commissioner, or the Insurance
Commissioner’s designee;
[(15)] (18) The Executive Director of the Health Services Cost Review
Commission, or the Executive Director’s designee;
[(16)] (19) The Executive Director of the Office of Minority Health and
Health Disparities, or the Executive Director’s designee;
[(17)] (20) The Executive Director of the Maryland Health Care
Commission, or the Executive Director’s designee;
[(18)] (21) The Executive Director of the Maryland Community Health
Resources Commission, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(22) THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY, OR
THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
[(19)] (23) One representative of a local health department, designated by
the Maryland Association of County Health Officers; and
[(20)] (24) The following members, appointed by the Secretary with the
advice of the Health Services Cost Review Commission:
(i) At least one representative of hospitals in the State;
(ii) At least two individuals with experience in hospital–based
population health;
(iii) At least one representative of a federally qualified health center
in the State;
(iv) At least two representatives of community–based organizations;
(v) At least two patients from underserved communities;
(vi) At least one representative of a managed care organization;
(vii) At least one representative of a commercial health insurer;
(VIII) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER OF THE MOVING FORWARD
NURSING HOME QUALITY COALITION;
[(viii)] (IX) At least two representatives of clinicians and providers
who are not affiliated with a hospital or a federally qualified health center;

SENATE BILL 560
[(ix)] (X) At least one representative from the State Rural Health
Office; and
[(x)] (XI) At least one representative of a tribal community in the
State.
13–4305.
(a) The [purpose] PURPOSES of the Commission [is] ARE to:
(1) Employ a health equity framework to:
(i) Develop a statewide health equity plan; and
(ii) Examine:
1. The health of residents of the State to the extent necessary
to carry out the requirements of this section;
2. Ways for units of State and local government to
collaborate to implement policies that will positively impact the health of residents of the
State; and
3. The impact of the following factors on the health of
residents of the State:
A. Access to safe and affordable housing;
B. Educational attainment;
C. Opportunities for employment;
D. Economic stability;
E. ACCESS TO TRANSPORTATION, TRANSIT PROGRAMS,
AND TRANSIT SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN § 7–101 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE;
F. PROXIMITY TO HEALTH CARE FACILITIES, AS
DEFINED IN § 19–114 OF THIS ARTICLE, AND PRIMARY CARE PROVIDERS;
[E.] G. Environmental factors;
[F.] H. Public safety, including the impact of crime, citizen
unrest, the criminal justice system, and governmental policies that affect individuals who
are in prison or released from prison; and

SENATE BILL 560 5
[G.] I. Food insecurity;
(2) Provide direct advice to the Secretary and the State’s independent
health regulatory commissions, and indirect advice to the Department’s senior
administrators and planners through the Secretary, regarding issues of racial, ethnic,
cultural, or socioeconomic health disparities;
(3) Facilitate coordination of the expertise and experience of the State’s
health and human services, housing, transportation, education, environment, community
development, and labor systems in developing a comprehensive health equity plan
addressing the social determinants of health; and
(4) Set goals for health equity and prepare a plan for the State to achieve
health equity in alignment with any other statewide planning activities.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.